Hawaii statutes.
§11-359 Family contributions. (a)
A contribution by a dependent minor shall be reported in the name of the minor
but included in the aggregate contributions of the minor's parent or guardian.

(b) A contribution by the candidate's
immediate family shall be exempt from section 11-357, but shall be limited in
the aggregate to $50,000 in any election period; provided that the aggregate
amount of loans and contributions received from the candidate's immediate
family does not exceed $50,000 during an election period. [L 2010, c 211, pt of
§2; am L 2014, c 48, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next